District of Columbia statutes.
29-1008.05

Term of director.

(a)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, and subject to subsections (c) and (d) and § 29-1003.03(c), the term of a director shall expire at the annual members meeting following the director’s election or appointment. The term of a director shall not exceed 3 years.

(b)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director may be reelected.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a director shall continue to serve until a successor director is elected or appointed and qualifies or the director is removed, resigns, is adjudged incompetent, or dies.

(d)

Unless the organic rules otherwise provide, a director shall not serve the remainder of the director’s term if the director ceases to qualify to be a director.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

History

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 805 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act. Edition

Editor's Notes